Hawaii statutes.
[§269-135] Recovery of electric utility
company costs. (a) An electric utility company may recover, through an
automatic rate adjustment clause, its revenue requirement resulting from the
capital costs that it prudently incurs for on-island transmission
infrastructure; provided that the commission has approved the utility's
commitment of capital expenditure costs for the project.

(b) To provide for timely recovery of the
revenue requirement, the commission shall establish a separate automatic rate
adjustment clause for that purpose, or modify an existing automatic rate
adjustment clause. The use of the automatic rate adjustment clause to recover
the revenue requirement shall be allowed to continue until the revenue
requirement is incorporated in rates in an electric utility company's rate
case.

(c) The electric utility company's revenue
requirement shall include:

(1) The commission-approved rate of return, as set in
the electric utility company's last rate case, on the utility's net investment
in the high-voltage electric transmission cable system from the acquisition
date of the high-voltage electric transmission cable system, and in the
on-island transmission infrastructure from the date the on-island transmission
infrastructure is completed and available for service;

(2) Depreciation; and

(3) Revenue taxes and other relevant costs as
approved by the commission.

(d) The electric utility company's net
investment includes costs incurred by the electric utility for planning,
permitting, and constructing the on-island transmission infrastructure,
including an allowance for funds used during construction where the utility
finances the planning, permitting, and construction costs, less offsets such as
accumulated depreciation and associated unamortized deferred income taxes.

(e) The on-island transmission infrastructure shall
be available for service before the commercial operations date of the
high-voltage electric transmission cable system. Notwithstanding any other
provision in this chapter to the contrary, at the time the commission approves
the electric utility company's commitment of capital expenditure costs for the
project, the commission may either:

(1) Allow the electric utility company to recover its
approved revenue requirement resulting from the capital costs that it prudently
incurs for on-island infrastructure at the time that the infrastructure is
available for service; or

(2) Allow the company to continue to accrue an
allowance for funds used during construction on such prudently incurred capital
costs until the commercial operations date for the high-voltage electric
transmission system.

(f) If the electric utility company elects not
to complete the on-island transmission infrastructure, and the commission
approves this election, or the electric utility company is precluded from
completing construction of the on-island transmission infrastructure, the
electric utility company shall be allowed to recover reasonable costs determined
by the commission to have been prudently
incurred by the electric utility company with
respect to the on-island transmission
infrastructure. The electric utility company shall be allowed by the
commission to recover the reasonable costs through the cable surcharge over a
period equal to the period during which the costs were incurred or five years,
whichever is greater. [L 2012, c 165, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next